Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
841

INQUESTS,
CORONERS

Section

841-1 Who are coroners

841-2 Appointment of deputies

841-3 Duties

841-4 Testimony under oath reduced to writing

841-5 Form of oath

841-6 Subpoenas; penalty for failure to comply

841-7 Reports of investigation

841-8 Duty to forward copy of reports to any
county or

prosecuting attorney and to person in
charge of

disposition of body

841-9 Fees

841-10 Decent burial

841-11 Witness fees and mileage; expenses

841-12 Removal of corpse

841-13 Disposition of personal effects

841-14 Autopsies and further investigations

841-14.5 Performance of autopsy by pathologist

841-14.6 Assistance among counties

841-15 Notice to next of kin, expense

841-16 Disposal of decomposed remains

841-17 Hospital records

841-18 Coroner's physician; laboratory facilities

841-19 Notification of this chapter

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next